Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-505
Museums; board; powers.

The museum board shall have the power to make and adopt such bylaws, rules, and regulations for its own guidance and for the government of the museum as it may deem expedient and not inconsistent with the provisions of sections 51-501 to 51-512. The board shall have power to employ any and all personnel necessary for the operation of the museum and to fix their salaries.

Laws 1957, c. 224, § 5, p. 769.